it: Tipo di cestello del palo: All-mountain/pista; Backcountry/touring; Intercambiabile; Junior; Nessuna; Nordico; Neve fresca; Racing; Standard; Altro
da: Trinsetype for stav: All-mountain/piste; Backcountry/touring; Udskiftelig; Junior; Ingen; Nordisk; Pudder; Racing; Standard; Andet
ja: ポールバスケットタイプ: オールマウンテン/ピステ; バックカントリー/ツーリング; 交換可能; ジュニア; なし; ノルディック; パウダー; レーシング; 標準; その他
nb: Trinsetype for stav: All-mountain/preparert løype; Frikjøring/topptur; Utskiftbar; Junior; Ingen; Nordisk; Pudder; Racing; Standard; Annet
lt-LT: Lazdų žiedo tipas: Visų kalnų (all-mountain) / trasos; Bekelės (backcountry) / turizmo; Keičiami; Jaunimo; Nėra; Šiaurietiški; Puriam sniegui; Lenktyniniai; Standartiniai; Kita
ro-RO: Tip de rozetă pentru bețe: All-mountain/pârtie; Schi de tură (backcountry); Interschimbabil; Junior; Fără; Schi nordic; Powder; Racing; Standard; Altele
es: Tipo de roseta del bastón: Todoterreno/pista; Fuerapista/travesía; Intercambiable; Junior; Ninguno; Nórdico; Nieve polvo; Carreras; Estándar; Otro
sk-SK: Typ koša na stĺp: All-mountain/zjazdovka; Backcountry/skialp; Vymeniteľné; Juniorské; Žiadny; Bežecké (Nordic); Prašan; Pretekárske; Štandardné; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta košare za štap: All-mountain / staza; Turno / izvan staze; Izmjenjive; Za juniore; Nema; Nordijske; Za duboki snijeg (powder); Za utrke; Standardne; Ostalo
th: ประเภทแป้นปลายไม้สกี: ออลเมาน์เทน/พิสต์; แบ็คคันทรี/ทัวร์ริง; ถอดเปลี่ยนได้; เด็ก; ไม่มี; นอร์ดิก; พาวเดอร์; แข่งขัน; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de panier sur poteau: Tout-terrain/piste; Hors-piste/randonnée; Interchangeable; Junior; Aucune; Nordique; Poudreuse; Course; Standard; Autre
nl: Type skistokteller: All-mountain/piste; Backcountry/touring; Verwisselbaar; Junior; Geen; Noords; Poeder; Racing; Standaard; Overig
sl-SI: Vrsta krpljice za palico: Vsegorsko/proga; Turno/izven urejenih smučišč; Zamenljivo; Mladinsko; Brez; Nordijsko; Celc; Tekmovalno; Standardno; Drugo
en: Pole basket type: All-mountain/piste; Backcountry/touring; Interchangeable; Junior; None; Nordic; Powder; Racing; Standard; Other
el: Τύπος καλαθιού στύλου: All-mountain/Πίστα; Εκτός πίστας/Ορειβατικό; Εναλλάξιμο; Παιδικό; Κανένα; Σκανδιναβικό; Πούδρα; Αγωνιστικό; Τυπικό; Άλλο
pl: Typ talerzyka kijka: All-mountain/trasa; Backcountry/skituring; Wymienny; Junior; Brak; Biegowy; Do puchu; Wyścigowy; Standardowy; Inne
cs: Typ s košíkem na tyči: All-mountain / sjezdovka; Backcountry / skialp; Vyměnitelné; Juniorské; Žádné; Běžecké; Do prašanu; Závodní; Standardní; Jiné
de: Stangentellerart: All-Mountain/Piste; Backcountry/Touring; Austauschbar; Junior; Keine; Nordic; Powder; Racing; Standard; Sonstige
zh-CN: 雪杖挡雪盘类型: 全地形/雪道; 野外/越野; 可互换; 青少年; 无; 北欧式; 粉雪; 竞速; 标准; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de ponta do bastão: All-mountain/pista; Backcountry/touring; Intercambiável; Júnior; Nenhum; Nórdico; Neve fresca; Corrida; Padrão; Outro
vi: Loại vòng chắn tuyết của gậy: Đa địa hình/đường trượt; Địa hình tự nhiên/đường dài; Có thể hoán đổi; Trẻ em; Không có; Bắc Âu; Tuyết xốp; Đua; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
ru: Тип корзины на опоре: Универсальные/для трассы; Бэккантри/туринг; Сменные; Детские; Нет; Беговые; Для глубокого снега; Гоночные; Стандартные; Другое
fi: Sauvan somman tyyppi: All mountain / rinne; Takamaasto/vaellus; Vaihdettava; Juniori; Ei mitään; Maastohiihto; Puuteri; Kilpa; Vakio; Muu
sv: Typ av stolpkorg: All-mountain/pist; Backcountry/turskidåkning; Utbytbar; Junior; Ingen; Nordisk; Puder; Racing; Standard; Annat
hu: Rúdkosár típusa: All-mountain / sípálya; Backcountry/túra; Cserélhető; Junior; Nincs; Nordic; Porhó; Verseny; Normál; Egyéb
tr: Baton sepet tipi: Tüm dağ/pist; Arazi/tur; Değiştirilebilir; Küçük; Yok; Nordik; Toz kar; Yarış; Standart; Diğer
pt-BR: Bastão, tipo de roseta: All-mountain/pista; Backcountry/touring; Intercambiável; Infantil; Nenhum; Nórdico; Powder; Corrida; Padrão; Outros
ko: 폴 바스켓 유형: 올마운틴/피스테; 백컨트리/투어링; 교체형; 주니어; 없음; 노르딕; 파우더; 레이싱; 표준; 기타
bg-BG: Тип кошница за щека: За всякакъв терен/писта; За извънпистово каране/туринг; Сменяеми; Младежки; Няма; Нордически; За пудра; Състезателни; Стандартни; Други
zh-TW: 登山杖擋泥板類型: 全地形/雪道; 越野/巡迴; 可替換; 青少年; 無; 北歐式; 粉雪; 競速; 標準; 其他